Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-724
Commission; executive secretary; personnel; employ; Attorney General; counsel; special counsel.

The Commission on Judicial Qualifications shall have the authority to employ an executive secretary, investigators, medical experts, and such other employees and experts as the commission in its discretion determines to be necessary to carry out its functions and purposes. The office of the Attorney General shall provide counsel to the commission but the commission may employ special counsel in any proceeding if determined by the commission to be advisable.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 10, p. 434.